District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.28

Discharge and release payments.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to furnish each prisoner upon his release from a penal or correctional institution under the jurisdiction of the government of the District of Columbia with suitable clothing and, in the discretion of the Mayor, a sum of money, which shall not exceed $100.

History

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 506, Pub. L. 93-140, § 12

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-427.
1973 Ed., § 24-427.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.